Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-3403
Financial liability; assumption; conditions; applicability.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a peer-to-peer vehicle sharing program shall assume financial liability on behalf of an owner for any claim for bodily injury or property damage to third parties or uninsured and underinsured motorist losses during the sharing period in an amount stated in the agreement. Such amount shall not be less than the amount required in section 60-310.

(2) The assumption of financial liability by a program under subsection (1) of this section does not apply if the owner:

(a) Makes a material, intentional, or fraudulent misrepresentation, or a material, intentional, or fraudulent omission, to a program relating to the vehicle or the agreement prior to the sharing period in which the assumption of such liability would otherwise be required; or

(b) Acts in concert with a driver to trigger the assumption of such liability that would otherwise be required.

(3) The assumption of financial liability under subsection (1) of this section applies to bodily injury, property damage, and uninsured and underinsured motorist losses by injured third parties.

Laws 2024, LB1073, § 3.